src-fst-affixes-propernouns.lexc.md
2007 s.87
* 1. Yksitav. / Vi ( maa, tuorestai)	 = vanha_n_1
* 1.1. Yksitav. monikko/ Vi ( häät)	 = vanha_n_1pl
* 2. Vokaalirankaiset
- 2.1 Kaksitav. ( aika, pappi)	 = vanha_n_21
- 2.1.1. Kaksitav. monikko (housut)  = vanha_n_21pl
- 2.1.2. Kaksitav. (joki: joke)      = vanha_n_21ie
- 2.2. Usseempitav. (opettaaja)	 = vanha_n_22
- 2.2.1. Usseempitav. odd (meininki, tunturi)= vanha_n_22odd
- 2.2.2. Usseempitav. mon. oi (kulkkiija) = vanha_n_22oi
- 2.3 Kokkoontumanom. ( valkkee,)	= vanha_n_23
- 2.3.1 Kokkoontumanom. ( assii)     = vanha_n_23ii
* 3. Konsonanttirankaiset
- 3.1 Kaksitav. ( pieni, kieli)  = vanha_n_31
- 3.1.1. lumi:lumen:lunta      = vanha_n_31m
- 3.1.2. (käsi, vuosi)   = vanha_n_31si
- 3.1.3. (lapsi)	     = vanha_n_31lapsi
- 3.1.4. (mies)		= vanha_n_31mies
- 3.2 Usseempitav. ( tytär)
- 3.2.1 (tytär)            = vanha_n_32
- 3.2.2. (elläin: elläimen  = vanha_n_32m
- 3.2.3. (rakkhaus)	  = vanha_n_32s
- 3.3 Kokkoontumanom. ( opas, huonet)
- 3.3.1 (opas)               = vanha_n_33s
- 3.3.2 (asukas)             = vanha_n_33s
- 3.3.3. (ruvis)             = vanha_n_33is
- 3.3.4 (huonet)             = vanha_n_33t
- 3.3.5 (kirves)		   = vanha_n_33ts
* 4. Ekstrakonsonanttirankaiset
- 4.1 veres-nominit ( veres, kokkous)		= vanha_n_41
- 4.1.1. veres-nominit monikko ( veljekset)	= vanha_n_41pl
- 4.2 –inen-nominit ( kainulainen)		  	= vanha_n_42 = nen
- 4.2.1 -inen-nominit Pl (tervheiset)	  	= vanha_n_42pl = nen
- 4.2.2 -inen-nominit odd (vihrinen)	  	= vanha_n_42odd = nen


















































































* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fkv/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc)</small>
